sl-SI: Zasnova linije za poravnavo na žogici za golf: Puščica za poravnavo; ClearPath; Brez; Pix Graphics; Črta; Triple Track; Drugo
sk-SK: Konštrukcia zarovnávacích línií golfovej loptičky: Zarovnávacia šípka; ClearPath; Žiadne; Grafika Pix; Pásik; Triple Track; Iné
ko: 골프공 정렬 디자인: 정렬 화살표; 클리어패스; 없음; 픽스 그래픽; 스트라이프; 트리플 트랙; 기타
en: Golf ball alignment design: Alignment Arrow; ClearPath; None; Pix Graphics; Stripe; Triple Track; Other
de: Ausrichtungsdesign des Golfballs: Ausrichtungspfeil; ClearPath; Keines; Pix-Grafiken; Streifen; Triple Track; Andere
hr-HR: Dizajn poravnanja loptice za golf: Strelica za poravnavanje; ClearPath; Ništa; Grafika Pix; Pruga; Trostruka pruga (Triple Track); Ostalo
tr: Golf topu hizalama tasarımı: Hizalama oku; ClearPath; Yok; Pix Grafikleri; Çizgi; Triple Track; Diğer
ro-RO: Designul alinierii mingii de golf: Săgeată de aliniere; ClearPath; Fără; Pix Graphics; Stripe; Triple Track; Altele
fr: Conception de l’aide à l’alignement de la balle de golf: Flèche d’alignement; ClearPath; Aucun; Graphiques Pix; Bande; Triple Track; Autre
pt-PT: projeto de alinhamento da bola de golfe: Seta de alinhamento; ClearPath; Nenhum; Gráficos Pix; Lista; Triple Track; Outro
fi: Golfpallon kohdistuskuvio: Kohdistusnuoli; ClearPath; Ei mitään; Pix Graphics; Raita; Triple Track; Muu
zh-TW: 高爾夫球對準標記設計: 瞄準箭頭; ClearPath; 無; Pix 圖案; 條紋; 三軌瞄準; 其他
pt-BR: Design de alinhamento da bola de golfe: Seta de alinhamento; ClearPath; Nenhum; Pix Graphics; Faixa; Triple Track; Outro
vi: Thiết kế căn chỉnh bóng golf: Mũi tên căn chỉnh; ClearPath; Không có; Đồ họa Pix; Sọc; Triple Track; Khác
lt-LT: Golfo kamuoliuko lygiavimo dizainas: Išlyginimo rodyklė; „ClearPath“; Nėra; „Pix Graphics“; Juostelė; „Triple Track“; Kita
el: Σχεδιασμός ευθυγράμμισης μπάλας γκολφ: Βέλος ευθυγράμμισης; ClearPath; Κανένα; Pix Graphics; Ρίγα; Triple Track; Άλλο
nl: Golfbal uitlijningsontwerp: Uitlijnpijl; ClearPath; Geen; Pix Graphics; Streep; Triple Track; Anders
sv: Riktningsdesign för golfboll: Siktpil; ClearPath; Ingen; Pix-grafik; Rand; Triple Track; Annan
nb: Design av golfballjustering: Siktepil; ClearPath; Ingen; Pix-grafikk; Stripe; Triple Track; Annet
ru: Дизайн выравнивания мяча для гольфа: Стрелка для прицеливания; ClearPath; Нет; Графика Pix; Полоса; Тройная линия (Triple Track); Другое
it: Progettazione dell'allineamento delle palline da golf: Freccia di allineamento; ClearPath; Nessuno; Grafiche Pix; A strisce; Triple Track; Altro
bg-BG: Дизайн за подравняване на топката за голф: Стрелка за подравняване; ClearPath; Няма; Pix Graphics; Ивица; Triple Track; Друго
es: Diseño de alineación de la pelota de golf: Flecha de alineación; ClearPath; Ninguno; Gráficos Pix; Franja; Triple Track; Otro
hu: Golflabda igazítási minta: Célzó nyíl; ClearPath; Nincs; Pix grafika; Csíkos; Triple Track; Egyéb
pl: Wzór wyrównujący piłki golfowej: Strzałka celownicza; ClearPath; Brak; Pix Graphics; Pasek (Stripe); Triple Track; Inny
th: การออกแบบการจัดแนวลูกกอล์ฟ: ลูกศรเล็งทิศทาง; ClearPath; ไม่มี; กราฟิก Pix; ลายแถบ; ทริปเปิลแทร็ก; อื่นๆ
cs: Typ šablony pro značení golfových míčků: Zarovnávací šipka; ClearPath; Žádný; Pix Graphics; Proužek; Triple Track; Ostatní
ja: ゴルフボールのアライメント設計: アライメントアロー; ClearPath; なし; Pix Graphics; ストライプ; トリプルトラック; その他
da: Design til justering på golfbold: Justeringspil; ClearPath; Ingen; Pix-grafik; Stribe; Triple Track; Andet
zh-CN: 高尔夫球瞄准线设计: 瞄准箭头; ClearPath 对准线; 无; Pix 像素图案; 条纹; 三轨瞄准线; 其他